Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-166
Compensation
court; annual report; contents.

On or before January
1 of each year, the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall submit electronically an annual report to the Clerk of the Legislature for
the past fiscal year which shall include (1) pertinent information regarding
settlements and awards made by the compensation court, (2) the causes of the
accidents leading to the injuries for which the settlements and awards were
made, (3) a statement of the total expense of the compensation court, (4)
any other matters which the compensation court deems proper to include, and
(5) any recommendations it may desire to make.

Laws 1917, c. 85, § 29, p. 221;

C.S.1922, § 3080;

C.S.1929, § 48-157;

Laws 1935, c. 57, § 36, p. 206;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-157;

R.S.1943, § 48-166;

Laws 1945, c. 113, § 6, p. 366;

Laws 1955, c. 231, § 7, p. 720;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 99;

Laws 1999, LB 216, § 16;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 16.